District of Columbia statutes.
16-2394

Unlawful disclosure.

Whoever willfully discloses, receives, makes use of, or knowingly permits the use of information concerning a child or other person in violation of section 16-2393 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01] or imprisoned for not more than 90 days, or both. A violation of this section shall be prosecuted by the Corporation Counsel of the District of Columbia.

History

Apr. 4, 2001, D.C. Law 13-273, § 3(b), 48 DCR 1637
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 281(f), 60 DCR 2064

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01]” for “not more than $250”.

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition of subchapter V, “Permanent Guardianship”, consisting of §§ 16-2381 to 16-2399, see § 3(b) of the Adoption and Guardianship Subsidy Temporary Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Law 18-208, July 27, 2010, law notification 57 DCR 7547).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of the Foster Children’s Guardianship Legislative Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-490, December 18, 2000, 48 DCR 63).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 3(c) of Foster Children’s Guardianship Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-4, February 13, 2001, 48 DCR 2254).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 281(f) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.